tools/nvda/louis/tables/yi.utb
# liblouis: Uncontracted braille table for Yiddish.
#
#
# This file is part of liblouis.
#
# liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
# under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
# published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
# License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
# liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
# WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
# Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License along with liblouis. If not, see
# <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

#-license: LGPLv2.1

# Copyright (C) 2024 by Abby Howell <abby.g.howell@gmail.com>

#-copyright: 2024, Abby Howell <abby.g.howell@gmail.com>

#-index-name: Yiddish
#-display-name: Yiddish braille

#+language: yi
#+type: literary
#+dots: 6
#+contraction: no
#+grade: 1
#+direction:forward

# This table was created by Abby Howell, Matthew Shifrin, and Harris Mowbray

#-author: Abby Howell <abby.g.howell@gmail.com>
#-author: Matthew Shifrin <matshifrin@aol.com>

# Yiddish is a Jewish language written in the Hebrew alphabet, which has
# been spoken by Ashkenazic Jewish communities in Eastern Europe and their
# descendants for over 1000 years. Although Yiddish is written using the
# same alphabet as Hebrew, not all of Unicode characters used in Yiddish
# are represented in the Hebrew Braille tables. Additionally, in Hebrew,
# the letters are only used to represent consonants, and the vowels are
# written with diacritic accent characters and often omitted entirely. In
# Yiddish, by contrast, all vowel sounds are represented by letters or
# combinations of letters. Because of this, even though the two languages
# share an alphabet, they need to use separate Braille tables.

# Background:
#
# This braille table is being proposed by a sighted teacher and a blind student
# of Yiddish at the Boston Worker's Circle, who have been working together, along
# with a consortium of advisors, to make the language accessible through braille.
#
# Yiddish was incorporated into unicode two decades ago with a few special characters
# and combinations of letters which have unique unicode characters, which are not
# represented by the Hebrew Braille table. The result is that, when a blind reader
# tries to read a Yiddish text file, many of the characters are not represented, filling
# the output with "mystery characters".
# This table is needed so that braille reader software will be able to recognize
# the unicode characters that represent Yiddish and display them in readable Braille.

# This table is informed by and inspired by the Hebrew Braille table, but with Braille
# characters assigned to the letters based on the way they are pronounced in Yiddish.

# Notable differences with the Hebrew Braille table are as follows:
# The letter ayin is used in Yiddish as a vowel "e". We have assigned it dots 15,
# overriding the Hebrew's 1246.
# The letter vov is used in Yiddish as the vowel "u", and two vovs are the consonant "v".
# We assigned the single vov dots 346, overriding Hebrew's 2456, and we assigned
# the double-vov dots 1236.
# The second letter of the Hebrew alphabet, beys, can be pronounced like a "b" or like a "v".
# In Hebrew Braille, the letter is assigned dots 1236, and when it has a dagesh (a dot
# in the middle of the letter representing that it's pronounced as a stop), it gets dots 12.
# In Yiddish, this letter is used to represent the sound "b" in most cases, and when it
# is used to represent the sound "v" it is written with a "rafe" which is a line
# above the letter (the rafe is not generally used in Hebrew). So we have assigned the
# unmarked beys the dots 12, and the beys with rafe (called "veys" in Yiddish) the dots 2456.
# There are a handful of special letter combinations that are used in Yiddish to represent
# dipthongs (combination vowels). The letters vov-yud are used to represent the sound "oy" and
# we've assigned that combo dots 246. The letters yud-yud are used to represent the sound "ey"
# and we've assigned them dots 26. The letters yud-yud-pasekh represent the sound "ay" and
# we've assigned them dots 356.
# For the letter alef with pasekh, used in Yiddish to represent the vowel "a", we've assigned
# dots 12346. For the letter alef with komets, used in Yiddish to represent the sound "o", we've
# selected dots 12356.

# In the process, we've relied on a consortium of experts for advice, including:
# - Mark David, a board member of the League for Yiddish, who was involved in the
# effort to incorporate Yiddish into Unicode over 20 years ago. He is the force behind
# UYIP.org, a website and listserve for Understanding Yiddish Information Processing.
# - Harry Bochner, a linguist and software engineer who co-authored the
# Comprehensive Yiddish-English Dictionary
# - Caryn Navy, a braille expert who works at Duxbury Systems
# - Harris Mowbray, a software engineer with experience creating Braille tables
# for other languages
# - Daniel Carkner, a (sighted) Yiddish speaker who also reads UEB Braille

# The final mapping of Yiddish letters to Braille characters was decided by
# Matthew Shifrin after a semester of learning to read Yiddish with various
# draft Braille tables. The final map is as follows:
#
# shtumer alef א 1 ⠁
# pasekh alef אַ 12346 ⠯
# komets alef אָ 12356 ⠷
# beys ב 12 ⠃
# veys בֿ 2456 ⠺
# giml ג 1245 ⠛
# daled ד 145 ⠙
# hey ה 125 ⠓
# vov ו 346 ⠬
# tsvey vovn װ 1236 ⠧
# vov yud ױ 246 ⠪
# zayin ז 1356⠵
# khes ח 1346 ⠭
# tes ט 2345 ⠞
# yud י 245 ⠚
# tsvey yudn ײ 26 ⠢
# pasekh tsvey yudn ײַ 356 ⠴
# kof כּ 13 ⠅
# khof  כ 16 ⠡
# lamed ל 123 ⠇
# mem מ 134 ⠍
# nun נ 1345 ⠝
# samekh ס 234 ⠎
# ayin ע 15 ⠑
# pey פּ 1234 ⠏
# fey פֿ 124 ⠋
# tsadik צ 2346 ⠮
# kuf ק 12345 ⠟
# reysh ר 1235 ⠗
# shin ש 146 ⠩
# sin שׂ 156 ⠱
# tof תּ 1256 ⠳
# sof ת 1456 ⠹

# Braille indicators
numsign 3456  number sign, just a dots operand

capsletter 6
begcapsword 6-6
endcapsword 6-3

# literary forms of the decimal digits
include litdigits6Dots.uti

# display/passthrough for unicode braille
include braille-patterns.cti

# include the hebrew braille table
include he-IL.utb

include en-chardefs.cti All character definition opcodes


# YIDDISH

punctuation   \x05BF  36         # HEBREW POINT RAFE
letter        \x05D0  1          # YIDDISH LETTER SHTUMER ALEF (silent letter)
letter        \xFB2E  12346      # YIDDISH LETTER PASEKH ALEF (a)
letter        \xFB2F  12356      # YIDDISH LETTER KOMETS ALEF (o)
letter	      \xfb31	12         # YIDDISH LETTER BEYS WITH DAGESH (b)
letter        \xFB4C  2456       # YIDDISH LETTER VEYS WITH RAFE (v)
letter	      \x05d1	12         # YIDDISH LETTER BEYS (b)
letter        \x05D2  1245       # YIDDISH LETTER GIML (g)
letter        \x05D3  145        # YIDDISH LETTER DALED (d)
letter        \x05D4  125        # YIDDISH LETTER HEY (h)
letter        \x05D5  346        # YIDDISH LETTER VOV (u)
letter	      \xfb35	346        # YIDDISH LETTER MELUPM VOV (u)
letter        \x05F0  1236       # YIDDISH LIGATURE TSVEY VOVN (v)
letter        \x05F1  246        # YIDDISH LIGATURE VOV YUD (oy)
letter        \x05D6  1356       # YIDDISH LETTER ZAYIN (z)
letter        \x05D7  1346       # YIDDISH LETTER KHES (kh)
letter        \x05D8  2345       # YIDDISH LETTER TES (t)
letter        \x05D9  245        # YIDDISH LETTER YUD (i)
letter	      \xfb1d	245 	     # YIDDISH LETTER KHIRIK YUD (i)
letter        \x05F2  26         # YIDDISH LIGATURE TSVEY YUDN (ey)
letter        \xFB1F  356        # YIDDISH LIGATURE PASEKH TSVEY YUDN (ay)
letter        \xFB3B  13         # YIDDISH LETTER KOF (k)
letter        \x05DB  16         # YIDDISH LETTER KHOF (kh)
letter        \x05DA  16         # YIDDISH LETTER LANGER KHOF (kh)
letter        \x05DC  123        # YIDDISH LETTER LAMED (l)
letter        \x05DE  134        # YIDDISH LETTER MEM (m)
letter        \x05DD  134        # YIDDISH LETTER SHLOS MEM (m)
letter        \x05E0  1345       # YIDDISH LETTER NUN (n)
letter        \x05DF  1345       # YIDDISH LETTER LANGER NUN (n)
letter        \x05E2  15         # YIDDISH LETTER AYIN (e)
letter        \xFB44  1234       # YIDDISH LETTER PEY WITH DAGESH (p)
letter        \xFB4E  124        # YIDDISH LETTER FEY WITH RAFE (f)
letter        \x05E4  124        # YIDDISH LETTER FEY (f)
letter        \x05E3  124        # YIDDISH LETTER LANGER FEY (f)
letter        \x05E6  2346       # YIDDISH LETTER TSADIK (ts)
letter        \x05E5  2346       # YIDDISH LETTER LANGER TSADIK (ts)
letter        \x05E7  12345      # YIDDISH LETTER KUF (k)
letter        \x05E8  1235       # YIDDISH LETTER REYSH (r)
letter        \x05E9  146        # YIDDISH LETTER SHIN (sh)
letter        \xFB2B  156        # YIDDISH LETTER SIN (s)
letter        \xFB4A  1256       # YIDDISH LETTER TOF (t)
letter        \x05EA  1456       # YIDDISH LETTER SOF (s)

always    \x05D5\x05D9  246        # YIDDISH LETTER VOV YUD (oy)
always    \x05D5\x05D5  1236       # YIDDISH LETTER VOV VOV (v)
always    \x05D9\x05D9  26         # YIDDISH LETTER YUD YUD
always    \x05F2\x05B7  356        # YIDDISH LETTER PASEKH TSVEY YUDN WITH SEPARATE PASEKH
always    \xFB1F        356        # YIDDISH LETTER PASEKH TSVEY YUDN
always    \x05D1\x05BF  2456       # YIDDISH LETTER VEYS WITH SEPARATE RAFE
always    \xFB4C        2456       # YIDDISH LETTER VEYS WITH SEPARATE RAFE
always    \x05DB\x05BC  13         # YIDDISH LETTER KAF WITH SEPARATE DAGESH
always    \xFB3B        13         # YIDDISH LETTER KAF WITH DAGESH כּ
always    כּ         13             # YIDDISH LETTER KAF WITH SEPARATE DAGESH כּ
always    פּ       1234             # YIDDISH LETTER PEY WITH SEPARATE DAGESH פּ
always    פּ       1234             # YIDDISH LETTER PEY WITH DAGESH פּ
always    \x05E4\x05BC  1234       # YIDDISH LETTER PEY WITH SEPARATE DAGESH פּ
always    פֿ        124             # YIDDISH LETTER FEY WITH RAFE פֿ
always    \x05E4\x05BF  124        # YIDDISH LETTER FEY WITH SEPARATE RAFE פֿ
always    \x05E9\x05C2  156        # YIDDISH LETTER SIN WITH SEPARATE DOT
always    שׂ        156             # YIDDISH LETTER SIN WITH DOT שׂ
always    שׂ        156             # YIDDISH LETTER SIN WITH SEPARATE DOT שׂ
always    \x05EA\x05BC  1256       # YIDDISH LETTER TOF WITH SEPARATE DAGESH תּ
always    תּ       1256             # YIDDISH LETTER TOF WITH SEPARATE DAGESH תּ
always    \x05D0\x05B7  12346      # YIDDISH LETTER PASEKH ALEF WITH SEPARATE PASEKH
always    אַ        12346           # YIDDISH LETTER PASEKH ALEF WITH SEPARATE PASEKH
always    \x05D0\x05B8  12356      # YIDDISH LETTER KOMETS ALEF WITH SEPARATE KOMETS
always    אָ        12356           # YIDDISH LETTER KOMETS ALEF WITH SEPARATE KOMETS
always    \x05D5\x05BC  346        # YIDDISH LETTER MELUPM VOV WITH SEPARATE DAGESH
always    וּ        346             # YIDDISH LETTER MELUPM VOV WITH SEPARATE DAGESH
always    \x05D9\x05B4  245        # YIDDISH LETTER KHIREK YUD WITH SEPARATE KHIREK
always    יִ        245             # YIDDISH LETTER KHIREK YUD WITH SEPARATE KHIREK
always    ב         12             # YIDDISH LETTER BEYS ב
always    בּ         12             # YIDDISH LETTER BEYS WITH DAGESH בּ
always    \x05E2     15            # YIDDISH LETTER AYIN (e)
always    \x05D5     346           # YIDDISH LETTER VOV (u)
